Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1004.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1581XC (2) 91 as/js S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 692A.102, subsection 1, paragraph a, 1 Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (20) Assault by criminal groping in 3 violation of section 709.11A, if a determination is made that 4 the offense was sexually motivated pursuant to section 692A.126 5 and the victim is fourteen years of age or older. 6 Sec. 2. Section 692A.102, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 7 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 8 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (07) Assault by criminal groping in 9 violation of section 709.11A, if a determination is made that 10 the offense was sexually motivated pursuant to section 692A.126 11 and the victim is under fourteen years of age. 12 Sec. 3. Section 692A.126, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 13 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 14 NEW PARAGRAPH . x. Assault by criminal groping in violation 15 of section 709.11A. 16 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 709.11A Assault by criminal groping. 17 1. As used in this section: 18 a. âAssault by criminal gropingâ means an assault, as 19 defined in section 708.1, that involves intentional physical 20 contact with an intimate body part of another person, without 21 the intent to commit sexual abuse, as defined in section 709.1. 22 b. âIntimate body partâ means the clothed or unclothed inner 23 thigh, groin, buttock, or breast. 24 2. A person who commits assault by criminal groping commits 25 a serious misdemeanor. 26 3. A person who commits a second violation of this section 27 commits an aggravated misdemeanor. 28 4. A person who commits a third or subsequent violation of 29 this section commits a class âDâ felony. 30